Nebraska, session 109, LB711.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1007.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1007.11 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each
school district's formula need shall equal the difference of the sum of
the school district's basic funding, poverty allowance, limited English
proficiency allowance, focus school and program allowance, summer school
allowance, special receipts allowance, transportation allowance,
elementary site allowance, distance education and telecommunications
allowance, community achievement plan allowance, averaging adjustment,
new community achievement plan adjustment, student growth adjustment, any
positive student growth adjustment correction, and new schools school
adjustment minus the sum of the limited English proficiency allowance
correction, poverty allowance correction, and any negative student growth
adjustment correction.
(2) If the formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section is less than one hundred percent of the
formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the
formula need for such district shall equal one hundred percent of the
formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.
(3) If the formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section is more than one hundred twelve percent of
the formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the
formula need for such district shall equal one hundred twelve percent of
the formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated,
except that the formula need shall not be reduced pursuant to this
subsection for any district receiving a student growth adjustment for the
school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.
-2-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
(4) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
formula need for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated shall be the formula need
used in the final calculation of aid pursuant to section 79-1065 and for
districts that were affected by a reorganization with an effective date
in the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which aid is
certified for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated,
the formula need for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated shall be attributed
to the affected school districts based on information provided to the
department by the school districts or proportionally based on the
adjusted valuation transferred if sufficient information has not been
provided to the department.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1007.21, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1007.21 (1) For school fiscal year 2009-10 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, school districts may apply to the department for a two-
year new schools school adjustment, on a form prescribed by the
department, on or before October 15 of the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which the first-year new schools
school adjustment would be included in the calculation of state aid. Such
form shall require evidence of recent and expected student growth,
evidence that any a new building or the expansion or remodeling of any an
existing building that is being used as the basis for such adjustment
application is being completed to provide additional student capacity to
accommodate such growth and not to replace an existing building, evidence
that the school fiscal year for which the district would receive the
first-year adjustment will be the first full school fiscal year for which
students will utilize such additional capacity, and evidence of the
estimated additional student capacity to be provided by the project. On
or before the immediately following December 1, the department shall
-3-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
approve the estimated additional capacity for use in the adjustment,
approve a modified estimated additional capacity for use in the
adjustment, or deny the application based on the requirements of this
section, the evidence submitted on the application, and any other
information provided by the department. Each approval shall include an
approved estimated additional student capacity for any the new building.
The state board shall establish procedures for appeal of decisions of the
department to the state board for final determination.
(2) The first-year new schools school adjustment for each approved
district shall equal the school district's basic funding per formula
student multiplied by twenty percent of the approved estimated additional
student capacity. The second-year new schools school adjustment for each
approved district shall equal the school district's basic funding per
formula student multiplied by twenty ten percent of the approved
estimated additional student capacity.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2025 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
-4-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2025-26 2023-24 are null and void.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
-5-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
to such student growth adjustment.
Sec. 6. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
Average daily Allowable
membership of reserve
district percentage
-6-

LB711 LB711
2025 2025
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 7. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 8. Original sections 79-1007.11, 79-1007.21, 79-1022,
79-1022.02, 79-1023, 79-1027, and 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 9. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-